Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202059-1406
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the Music Licensing Agency Act shall be fined an amount not less than five hundred dollars and not more than two thousand dollars. Multiple violations on a single day may be considered separate violations.

Laws 1945, c. 139, § 6, p. 441;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 40.